Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act  is added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) An  insurer that offers a health benefit plan, as defined in ORS 743B.005,
that reimburses the  cost of counseling, prevention services or screening for sexually trans-
mitted infections, shall provide coverage for:
(a) Drugs that have been approved by the United  States Food and Drug Administration
for the prevention of human immunodeficiency virus;
(b) Services necessary  for the commencement or continuation of human
immunodeficiency virus  prevention drugs described in this section, including but not limited
to office visits, testing, vaccinations and monitoring services; and
(c) Drugs that have been  approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration
for the treatment of human immunodeficiency virus.
(2) The coverage under subsection (1)(a)  and (b) of this section must be provided without
cost-sharing, coinsurance or deductibles applicable to the services.
(3) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 743B.425 is amended to read:
743B.425. (1) An insurer offering a health benefit plan [ as defined in ORS 743B.005 ] may not:
(a) Require prior authorization:
(A) During the first 60 days of treatment, including  medication therapy, prescribed for opioid
or opiate withdrawal; or
(B) For  post-exposure prophylactic antiretroviral drugs or [ at least one ] preexposure prophylactic
antiretroviral [ drug] drugs, or drugs prescribed for the treatment of human immunodeficiency
virus or acquired immunodeficiency syndrome ; or
(b) Restrict  the reimbursement for medication therapies, preexposure prophylactic antiretroviral
drugs or  post-exposure prophylactic antiretroviral drugs to in-network pharmacists or pharmacies[ ;
or].
[(c) Subject to ORS 742.008, require a deductible,  copayment, coinsurance or other cost-sharing for
the coverage of human  immunodeficiency virus post-exposure prophylactic drugs or therapies prescribed
following a possible exposure to human immunodeficiency virus. ]
(2) This section is not subject to ORS 743A.001.
Enrolled House Bill 2292 (HB 2292-B) Page 1
(3) This section does  not prohibit prior authorization for opioids or opiates prescribed for pur-
poses other than medication therapy or treatment of opioid or opiate abuse or addiction.
(4) Subsection (1)(b) of this section does not apply to a health maintenance organization  as de-
fined in ORS 750.005.
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 5. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Prior authorization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.001.
(b) “Step therapy” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.001.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 414.325,  the Oregon Health Authority and a coordinated care
organization may not require prior authorization or step therapy for drugs prescribed  for a
medical assistance recipient for  the treatment or prevention of human immunodeficiency
virus if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the United States Food and  Drug Administration for
the treatment or prevention of human immunodeficiency virus; and
(b) The prescribing provider has determined that the drug is medically necessary.
(3) Nothing in this section prevents the authority or a coordinated care  organization
from performing drug utilization review that may be necessary  for patient safety or for en-
suring the prescribed drug is medically accepted as  required by section 1927 of the Social
Security Act of 1935 (42 U.S.C. 1396r-8).
SECTION 6.
 ORS 743B.001, as amended by  section 3, chapter 35, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended
to read:
743B.001. As used in this section and ORS 743.008, 743.029, 743.035, 743A.190,  743B.195,
743B.197, 743B.200, 743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.225,  743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258,  743B.310, 743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.405, 743B.420,
743B.422, 743B.423, 743B.424, 743B.425, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452, 743B.453, 743B.454, 743B.505,
743B.550, 743B.555 and 743B.602 and section 2, chapter 35, Oregon Laws 2024:
(1) “Adverse benefit determination” means an insurer’s denial, reduction or termination of  a
health care item or service, or an insurer’s  failure or refusal to provide or to make a payment in
whole or in part for a health care item or service, that is based on the insurer’s:
(a) Denial of eligibility for or termination of enrollment in a health benefit plan;
(b) Rescission or cancellation of a policy or certificate;
(c) Imposition  of a preexisting condition exclusion as defined in ORS 743B.005, source-of-injury
exclusion, network exclusion, annual benefit limit or other limitation on otherwise covered  items
or services;
(d) Determination that a health care item or service is experimental, investigational or  not
medically necessary, effective or appropriate;
(e) Determination that a course or  plan of treatment that an enrollee is undergoing is an active
course of treatment for purposes of continuity of care under ORS 743B.225; or
(f) Denial, in whole or in part, of a request for prior authorization, a request  for an exception
to step therapy or a request for coverage of  a treatment, drug, device or diagnostic or laboratory
test that is subject to other utilization review requirements.
(2) “Authorized representative” means  an individual who by law or by the consent of a person
may act on behalf of the person.
(3) “Clinical review criteria” means screening procedures, decision rules, medical  protocols and
clinical guidance used by an insurer or other entity in conducting utilization review and evaluating:
(a) Medical necessity;
(b) Appropriateness of an item or health service for which prior authorization  is requested or
for which an exception to step therapy has been requested as described in ORS 743B.602; or
(c) Any other coverage that is subject to utilization review.
(4) “Credit card” has the meaning given that term in 15 U.S.C. 1602.
(5) “Electronic funds transfer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 293.525.
(6) “Enrollee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
Enrolled House Bill 2292 (HB 2292-B) Page 2
(7) “Essential community provider” has the meaning given that term in rules adopted by  the
Department of Consumer and Business Services consistent with the description of  the term in 42
U.S.C. 18031 and the rules adopted by the United States Department of Health and Human Services,
the United States Department of the Treasury or the United  States Department of Labor to carry
out 42 U.S.C. 18031.
(8) “Grievance” means:
(a) A communication from an enrollee  or an authorized representative of an enrollee expressing
dissatisfaction with an adverse benefit determination, without specifically  declining any right to
appeal or review, that is:
(A) In writing, for an internal appeal or an external review; or
(B) In writing or orally, for an expedited response described in ORS 743B.250 (2)(d) or  an expe-
dited external review; or
(b) A written complaint submitted by an enrollee or  an authorized representative of an enrollee
regarding  the:
(A) Availability, delivery or quality of a health care service;
(B) Claims payment, handling or reimbursement for health care services and,  unless the enrollee
has not submitted a request for an internal appeal, the complaint is not  disputing an adverse benefit
determination; or
(C) Matters pertaining to the contractual relationship between an enrollee and an insurer.
(9) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(10) “Independent practice association” means a corporation wholly  owned by providers, or
whose membership consists entirely  of providers, formed for the sole purpose of contracting with
insurers for the  provision of health care services to enrollees, or with employers for the provision
of health care services to employees, or  with a group, as described in ORS 731.098, to provide health
care services to group members.
(11) “Insurer” includes a health care service contractor as defined in ORS 750.005.
(12) “Internal appeal” means a review by an insurer of an adverse benefit  determination made
by the insurer.
(13) “Managed health insurance” means any health benefit plan that:
(a) Requires an enrollee to use a  specified network or networks of providers managed, owned,
under contract with or employed by the insurer in order to  receive benefits under the plan, except
for emergency or other specified limited service; or
(b) In addition  to the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection, offers a point-of-service
provision that allows an enrollee to use providers outside of the specified  network or networks at
the option of the enrollee and receive a reduced level of benefits.
(14) “Medical services contract”  means a contract between an insurer and an independent
practice  association,  between an insurer and a provider, between an independent practice associ-
ation and a provider  or organization of providers, between medical or mental health clinics, and
between a medical or  mental health clinic and a provider to provide medical or mental health ser-
vices. “Medical services contract” does not include a contract of employment or a  contract creating
legal entities and ownership thereof that are authorized  under ORS chapter 58, 60 or 70, or other
similar professional organizations permitted by statute.
(15)(a) “Preferred provider organization insurance” means any health benefit plan that:
(A) Specifies a  preferred network of providers managed, owned or under contract with or em-
ployed by an insurer;
(B) Does not require an enrollee to use the preferred network of providers in order to  receive
benefits under the plan; and
(C) Creates financial incentives for an enrollee to use the preferred network  of providers by
providing an increased level of benefits.
(b) “Preferred provider organization insurance” does not mean a health benefit  plan that has
as its sole financial incentive a hold harmless provision under which  providers in the preferred
Enrolled House Bill 2292 (HB 2292-B) Page 3
network  agree  to accept as payment in full the maximum allowable amounts that are specified in
the medical services contracts.
(16) “Prior authorization” means a form of utilization review that requires a provider or an
enrollee to request a determination by an insurer, prior to the provision of health care  that is sub-
ject to utilization review, that the insurer will provide reimbursement for the health care requested.
“Prior authorization” does not include referral approval  for evaluation and management services
between providers.
(17)(a) “Provider” means a person licensed, certified or otherwise authorized  or permitted by
laws of this state to administer medical or mental health services in the ordinary course of  business
or practice of a profession.
(b) With respect to the statutes governing the  billing for or payment of claims, “provider” also
includes an employee or other designee of the provider who  has the responsibility for billing claims
for reimbursement or receiving payments on claims.
(18) “Step therapy” means a utilization review protocol,  policy or program in which an insurer
requires certain preferred drugs for treatment of a specific medical  condition be proven ineffective
or contraindicated before a prescribed drug may be reimbursed.
(19) “Utilization review” means a set of formal  techniques used by an insurer or delegated by
the insurer  designed to monitor the use of or evaluate the medical necessity, appropriateness, effi-
cacy or efficiency of health care items, services, procedures or settings.
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 7,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses by
the Public Employees’ Benefit Board from the Public Employees’ Revolving Fund for benefit
plan premiums and self-insurance, is increased by $767,644.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 8,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses by
the Oregon Educators Benefit Board from the Oregon Educators Revolving Fund for benefit
plan premiums and self-insurance, is increased by $682,867.
SECTION 9.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS  743B.425 by section
3 of this 2025 Act apply to  health benefit plans offered, renewed or extended on or after the
effective date of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2292 (HB 2292-B) Page 4
Passed by House June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2292 (HB 2292-B) Page 5